Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,175
Foreign corporation; subject to act; effect.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1997, is subject to the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under the act.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 175.